Connecticut, session 2026, HB05480.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section, (1)
"peer support services" means recovery-focused behavioral health
services that allow an individual the opportunity to learn to manage
such individual's recovery with help from a peer support specialist; and
(2) "peer support specialist" means an individual who (A) has
experience recovering from mental illness or substance use disorder,
and (B) is certified to provide peer recovery support under a program
administered by the Department of Mental Health and Addiction
Services.
(b) The Commissioner of Social Services shall amend the Medicaid
state plan to integrate peer support services into care teams funded
under the medical assistance program and provide Medicaid
reimbursement to peer support specialists for such services.
(c) Not later than August 1, 2027, the Commissioner of Social Services
shall file a report, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of
the general statutes, with the joint standing committees of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to human services and
public health on (1) the number of peer support specialists provided
LCO 1 of 2

Substitute Bill No. 5480
Medicaid reimbursement, (2) the number of Medicaid enrollees such
specialists serve, and (3) any outcome data on treatment provided by
such specialists to such enrollees.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Subsec. (c)(2), "they" was changed to "such specialists" for clarity.
HS Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 2 of 2